Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 1.5 DNA Detection of Sexual and Violent Offenders

12-1.5-1.
Policy. [Contingent amendment; see other version.]

The general assembly finds and declares that DNA databanks and DNA databases are important tools in criminal investigations, in the exclusion of individuals who are the subject of criminal investigations or prosecutions, and in deterring and detecting recidivism. Many states have enacted laws requiring persons arrested for, or convicted of, a crime of violence, or persons convicted of any felony, to provide genetic samples for DNA profiling. Moreover, it is the policy of this state to assist federal, state, and local criminal justice and law enforcement agencies in the identification and detection of individuals in criminal investigations. It is therefore in the best interest of the state to establish a DNA databank and a DNA database containing DNA samples and DNA records of individuals arrested for any crime of violence as defined in §

12-1.5-2

, or convicted of certain sexual and violent offenses, or convicted of any felony as defined in the general laws of Rhode Island, and missing persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 455, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 192, § 1.

12-1.5-1.
Policy. [Contingent effective date; see note.]

The general assembly finds and declares that DNA databanks and DNA databases are important tools in criminal investigations, in the exclusion of individuals who are the subject of criminal investigations or prosecutions, and in deterring and detecting recidivism. Many states have enacted laws requiring persons arrested for, or convicted of, a crime of violence as defined in §

12-1.5-2

to provide genetic samples for DNA profiling. Moreover, it is the policy of this state to assist federal, state, and local criminal justice and law enforcement agencies in the identification and detection of individuals in criminal investigations. It is in the best interest of the state to establish a DNA databank and a DNA database containing DNA samples and DNA records of individuals arrested for any crime of violence as defined in §

12-1.5-2

or convicted of a crime of violence as defined in §

11-47-2

, or convicted of any felony as defined in the general laws of Rhode Island, and missing persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 42, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 76, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 455, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 192, § 1.

12-1.5-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“CODIS” is derived from combined DNA index system, the Federal Bureau of Investigation’s national DNA identification index system that allows the storage and exchange of DNA records submitted by state and local forensic DNA laboratories;

“DNA” means deooxyribonucleic acid, which is located in the cells of the body and provides an individual’s personal genetic blueprint. DNA encodes genetic information that is the basis of human hereditary and forensic identification;

“DNA record” means DNA identification information only, which is stored in the state DNA database or the combined DNA index system for the purpose of generating investigative leads or supporting statistical interpretation of DNA test results. The DNA record is the result obtained from the DNA typing tests. The DNA record is comprised of the characteristics of a DNA sample that are of value only in establishing the identity of individuals. The DNA record, however, does not include the DNA sample, and the DNA record may never include the results of tests of any structural genes. The results of all DNA identification tests on an individual’s DNA sample are also collectively referred to as the DNA profile of an individual;

“DNA sample” means a blood or tissue sample provided by any person with respect to offenses covered by this chapter, or submitted to the department of health laboratory pursuant to this chapter for DNA analysis or storage, or both;

“F.B.I.” means the Federal Bureau of Investigation;

“State DNA databank” means the repository of DNA samples collected under this chapter, that is administered by the department of health; and

“State DNA database” means the state-level DNA identification record system to support law enforcement that is administered by the department of health and that provides DNA records to the F.B.I. for storage and maintenance in CODIS. It is the collective capability to store and maintain DNA records related to forensic casework, the DNA records of those arrested for crimes of violence as defined in §

12-1.5-2

and/or convicted offenders required to provide a DNA sample under state law, and anonymous DNA records used for research, quality control, and other DNA analysis support systems.

“Crimes of violence” include murder, manslaughter, first-degree arson, kidnapping with intent to extort, robbery, larceny from the person, first-degree sexual assault, second-degree sexual assault, first-and-second degree child molestation, assault with intent to murder, assault with intent to rob, assault with intent to commit first-degree sexual assault, burglary, and entering a dwelling house with intent to commit murder, robbery, sexual assault, or larceny.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 192, § 1.

12-1.5-3.
Powers and duties of the department of health.

In addition to any other powers and duties conferred by this chapter, the department of health shall:

Be responsible for the policy management and administration of the state DNA database and state DNA databank;

Promulgate rules and regulations, within one hundred and eighty (180) days of June 29, 1998, to carry out the provisions of this chapter; and

Provide for liaison with the F.B.I. and other criminal justice agencies in regard to the state’s participation in CODIS or in any DNA database designated by the department of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1.

12-1.5-4.
State DNA database.

There is established the state DNA database. It shall be administered by the department of health and provide DNA records for the F.B.I. for storage and maintenance by CODIS. The state DNA database shall have the capability provided by computer software and procedures administered by the department of health to store and maintain DNA records related to:

Forensic casework, including the identification of missing persons;

Individuals arrested for any crime of violence as defined in §

12-1.5-2

and convicted felony offenders required to provide a DNA sample under this chapter; and

Anonymous DNA records used for research on identification technologies or quality control.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 192, § 1.

12-1.5-5.
State DNA databank.

There is established the state DNA databank. It shall serve as the repository of DNA samples collected under this chapter and shall be administered by the department of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1.

12-1.5-6.
Procedural compatibility with F.B.I.

The DNA database system as established by this chapter shall be compatible with the procedures specified by the F.B.I., including use of comparable test procedures, laboratory equipment, supplies and computer software.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1.

12-1.5-7.
Scope and applicability. [Contingent amendment; see other version.]

For law enforcement purposes, this chapter is applicable to adult persons arrested for crimes of violence as defined in §

12-1.5-2

and/or convicted of any felony as defined in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 455, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 192, § 1.

12-1.5-7.
Scope and applicability. [Contingent effective date; see note.]

For law enforcement purposes, this chapter is applicable to adult persons arrested for any crime of violence as defined in §

12-1.5-2

and/or convicted of, or sentenced for, any felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 42, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 76, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 455, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 192, § 1.

12-1.5-8.
DNA sample required upon arrest or conviction for any crime of violence.

Every person arrested for a crime of violence as defined in §

12-1.5-2

, who pleads guilty or nolo contendere, or is convicted of any felony shall have a DNA sample taken for analysis as follows:

Every person who is sentenced to a term of confinement to prison, for any crime of violence as defined in §

12-1.5-2

, or any felony shall not be released prior to the expiration of his or her maximum term of confinement unless and until a DNA sample has been taken;

Every person convicted of any crime of violence as defined in § 12-1.5-2, or any felony, or who is sentenced thereon to any term of probation, or upon whose case sentencing is deferred shall have a DNA sample taken for analysis by the department of the health as a condition of any sentence which disposition will not involve an intake into prison.

Every person arrested for any crime of violence as defined in §

12-1.5-2

shall, at the time of booking, have a DNA sample taken for analysis and included in the Rhode Island DNA database and DNA databank respectively as required by this chapter and every such person shall be notified of his or her expungement rights under §

12-1.5-13

at or near the time the DNA sample is taken.

The DNA sample shall be submitted by the arresting authority to the department of health. The department of health shall not test or place the sample in the statewide DNA database prior to arraignment unless one of the following conditions has been met:

The arrestee appeared before any judicial officer for an arraignment and the judicial officer made a finding that there was probable cause for the arrest; or

The defendant was released and then failed to appear for the initial hearing, or escaped custody prior to appearing before a judicial officer.

If all qualifying criminal charges are determined to be unsupported by probable cause:

The DNA sample shall be immediately destroyed; and

Notice shall be sent by the prosecuting authority to the defendant and counsel of record for the defendant that the sample was destroyed.

The arrestee requests or consents to having their DNA sample processed prior to arraignment for the sole purpose of having the sample checked against a sample that has been processed from the crime scene or the hospital, and is related to the charges against the person.

A second DNA sample shall be taken if needed to obtain sufficient DNA for the statewide DNA database system or if ordered by the court for good cause shown.

All DNA samples taken pursuant to this section shall be taken in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department of health.

The director of the department of health shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the periodic review of the DNA identification database to determine whether or not the database contains DNA profiles that should not be in the database, including the steps necessary to expunge any profiles that the department determines should not be in the database.

The requirements of this chapter are mandatory. In the event that an arrestee’s DNA sample is not adequate for any reason, the arrestee shall provide another DNA sample for analysis.

A sample does not need to be collected if the person has previously provided a sample sufficient for DNA testing pursuant to the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 13; P.L. 2014, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 210, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 211, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

12-1.5-9.
Procedures for withdrawal, collection and transmission of DNA samples.

Only those individuals qualified to withdraw DNA samples in a medically approved manner shall withdraw a DNA sample to be submitted for DNA analysis.

Persons authorized to withdraw DNA samples under this section shall not be civilly or criminally liable for withdrawing a DNA sample and transmitting test results if they act in good faith and pursuant to this chapter.

It shall be a complete defense to a civil or criminal action if the law enforcement and correction officials who physically restrain a person for the taking of a DNA sample, acted in good faith and under the instruction and supervision of medical personnel under this statute to withdraw DNA samples.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1.

12-1.5-10.
Procedures for conduct, disposition and use of DNA analysis.

The department of health shall promulgate procedures to be used in the collection, submission, identification, analysis, storage and disposition of DNA samples and typing results of DNA samples submitted under this chapter. These procedures shall meet or exceed the current standards for quality assurance and proficiency testing for DNA analysis issued by the F.B.I. All DNA sample typing results, all DNA records and all DNA samples shall be securely stored in the state of Rhode Island DNA database and DNA databank respectively, in the following manner:

All DNA sample typing results and the DNA records shall be stored in a computer database after all personal identifiers have been removed. Further, these records shall be accessed only through the use of an encryption code. The encryption code shall be confidential and only those persons authorized by the department of health and charged with responsibilities under this chapter shall have access to these records and shall be given the encryption code.

All DNA samples shall be securely locked, with a coded locking system, in a DNA databank at the department of health and only the director of the department of health and the head of the DNA laboratory shall have access to these DNA samples to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

The department of health is authorized to contract with third parties for purposes of creating a DNA record only. Any third party contracting to carry out the functions of this chapter shall be subject to the same restrictions and requirements of this chapter, and DNA samples provided to third parties pursuant to this section shall have all personal identification removed.

Except as otherwise provided in §

12-1.5-11

, DNA samples and DNA records collected under this chapter shall be used only for law enforcement identification purposes or to assist in the recovery of identification of human remains from disasters or for other humanitarian identification purposes, including identification of missing persons; and

DNA samples and DNA records collected under this chapter shall never be used under the provisions of this chapter for the purpose of obtaining information about physical characteristics, traits or predispositions for disease.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 13.

12-1.5-11.
DNA database exchange.

It shall be the duty of the department of health to collect DNA samples, to receive, store, and to perform analysis or to contract for DNA typing analysis with a qualified DNA laboratory that meets the regulations as established by the department of health, to classify and to file the DNA record of identification characteristic profiles of DNA samples submitted under this chapter and to make the information available as provided in this section. Access to the DNA databank shall be for identification analysis only and shall be limited upon a showing of need to duly constituted federal, state and local law enforcement agencies and their servicing forensic DNA laboratories and by court order to the defendant or his or her attorney in a criminal case. The contents of the DNA record of individuals in the state DNA database shall be made available:

To criminal justice agencies or approved DNA forensic laboratories which serve these agencies; or

Upon written or electronic request and in furtherance of an official investigation by a criminal justice agency or its designated forensic laboratory of a criminal offense or offender or suspected offender;

To prosecuting attorneys who are actively involved in a case in which the DNA record of an individual is relevant; to grand juries and courts when such records are subpoenaed; to defense attorneys when the DNA record is relevant to a pending case.

The department of health shall consistent with the provisions of this chapter promulgate regulations governing the methods of obtaining information from the state DNA database and CODIS and procedures for verification of the identity and authority of the requester; and

The department of health may create a separate population database comprised of DNA samples obtained under this chapter after all personal identification is removed. The department of health may share or disseminate the population database with other criminal justice agencies or forensic DNA laboratories that serve to assist the department of health with statistical databases. The population database may be made available to and searched by other agencies participating in the CODIS system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1.

12-1.5-12.
Cancellation of authority to access or exchange DNA records.

The department of health shall be authorized, for good cause shown, to revoke or suspend the right of a forensic DNA laboratory within this state to access or exchange DNA identification records with criminal justice agencies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1.

12-1.5-13.
Expungement.

A person whose DNA record or profile has been included in the databank pursuant to this act may request expungement on the grounds that the conviction on which authority for including that person’s DNA record or profile was based has been reversed. The department of health shall purge all records and identifiable information in the database pertaining to the person and destroy all samples from the person upon receipt of a written request for expungement pursuant to this section and a certified copy of the final court order reversing the conviction. The department of health shall purge and destroy all records and identifiable information in its database and all DNA samples taken pursuant to this chapter from convicted persons upon official proof that the person has been deceased for a period of at least three (3) years. Official proof shall include, but not be limited to, a certified copy of a death certificate.

If the offense for which a DNA sample has been taken pursuant to §

12-1.5-8(b)

does not result in a charge through information or indictment; or leads to voluntary dismissal of the charge by the state, or dismissal by a court; or by a not guilty verdict after trial; or upon the vacating or the reversal of a conviction in which the state does not retry the defendant or appeal the decision; or loses such appeal upon hearing; or upon any plea or conviction of a lesser offense that would not give rise to the mandatory sampling of the individual’s DNA; the record or profile shall be expunged from the state DNA identification database, regardless of any prior record for which DNA sampling would not have been authorized, except pursuant to subsection (e) herein.

The prosecuting authority shall, within thirty (30) days of an event listed in this subsection, notify the department of health of such event for purposes of expunging the person’s DNA record and any samples, analyses, or other documents relating to the DNA testing of such individual in connection with the investigation, arrest, and/or prosecution of the crime that resulted in the arrest of the person. The department shall, within thirty (30) days of receiving such notification, destroy and expunge the person’s DNA record and any samples, analyses, or other documents relating to the DNA testing of such individual and shall notify the individual of such action.

Upon receipt of a written request for expungement from the person whose DNA record or profile has been included in the database pursuant to this chapter and notification of the completion of a program of diversion or the completion of the term of a sentence of deferment, or of the granting of a pardon, the record or profile shall be expunged from the state DNA identification database, regardless of any prior record for which DNA sampling would not have been authorized, except pursuant to subsection (e) herein, and such individual may apply to the court for an order directing the expungement of their DNA record and any samples, analyses, or other documents relating to the DNA testing of such individual in connection with the investigation, arrest, and/or prosecution of the crime that resulted in the arrest of the person.

A copy of the expungement motion shall be served on the attorney general and the arresting police department with ten (10) days’ notice prior to hearing, and an order directing expungement shall be granted if the court finds any of the appropriate conditions of the prior subsection are satisfied.

The department of health shall, by rule or regulation, prescribe procedures to ensure that the DNA record in the state DNA identification database, and any samples, analyses, or other documents relating to such record, whether in the possession of the division, or any law enforcement or police agency, or any forensic DNA laboratory, including any duplicates or copies thereof are destroyed, including any records from CODIS. The director of health shall also adopt, by rule and regulation, a procedure for the expungement in other appropriate circumstances of DNA records contained in the database.

No expungement shall be granted where an individual has a prior conviction requiring a DNA sample, or a pending charge for which collection of a sample was authorized pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based upon a database match or database information is not invalidated if it is determined that the sample was obtained or placed in the database by mistake. Any identification, warrant, or probable cause to arrest based upon a database match is not invalidated due to a failure to expunge or a delay in expunging records.

At the time of collection of the DNA sample upon arrest of any crime of violence as defined in §

12-1.5-2

, the individual from whom a sample is collected shall be given written notice that the DNA record may be expunged and the DNA sample destroyed in accordance with this section. In addition, the department of health, the office of the attorney general, and the office of the public defender shall post on their websites the expungement provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 192, § 1.

12-1.5-14.
Prohibition and disclosure.

Any person who, by virtue of employment or official position, or any person contracting to carry out any functions under this chapter, including any officers, employees and agents of a contractor, who has possession of or access to individually identifiable DNA information contained in the state DNA database or in the state DNA databank, shall not disclose it in any manner to any person or agency not authorized to receive it knowing that the person or agency is not authorized to receive it.

No person shall obtain individually identifiable DNA information from the state DNA database or the state DNA databank without authorization pursuant to this chapter to do so.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1.

12-1.5-15.
Criminal penalties — Civil remedies.

Any person who, by virtue of employment or official position, or any person contracting to carry out any functions under this chapter, including any officers, employees and agents of a contractor, having possession of or access to individually identifiable DNA information contained in the state DNA database or in the state DNA databank and discloses it in any manner to any person or agency not authorized to receive it, commits a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

Except as authorized by law, any person who, for purposes of having DNA analysis performed, obtains or attempts to obtain any DNA sample, or tampers or attempts to tamper with any DNA sample, commits a felony punishable by a fine not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both.

Any person aggrieved by a violation of §

12-1.5-14

may, in addition, bring a civil action for damages, injunctive relief, and reasonable attorneys’ fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1.

12-1.5-16.
Confidentiality of records.

All DNA profiles and samples submitted to the department of health pursuant to this chapter shall be treated as confidential and exempt from the provisions of chapter 2 of title 38 except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1.

12-1.5-17.
Bailed and convicted persons — Refusal to give DNA sample.

Any person who is required to have a DNA sample taken after having been arrested and charged with any crime of violence as defined in §

12-1.5-2

or convicted of any felony, who refuses to do so, and who knowingly, violently resists the taking of a DNA sample duly authorized by medical personnel, shall be in violation of the terms of his or her release, regardless of whether or not the term was a special condition of his or her bail, release on probation, parole, or home confinement, or other form of supervised release.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 192, § 1.

12-1.5-18.
Interpretation and severability.

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed and shall be held to be in addition to, and not in substitution for or a limitation of, the provisions of any other law. If any provision or part of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, the remainder of the chapter and the application of the provisions to any other persons or circumstances other than those to which it is held invalid shall not be affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 120, § 1.